Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-538
Waterworks; use of water; rates or rental; collection.

Such cities and villages shall have the right and power to tax, assess, and collect from the inhabitants thereof such tax, rent or rates for the use and benefit of water used or supplied to them by such waterworks, mains, portion or extension of any system of waterworks or water supply as the council or board of trustees shall deem just or expedient; and all such water rates, taxes or rent shall be a lien upon the premises, or real estate, upon or for which the same is used or supplied; and such taxes, rents or rates shall be paid and collected and such lien enforced in such manner as the council or board of trustees shall by ordinance direct and provide.

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XV, p. 179;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XV, p. 169;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XV, p. 298;

Laws 1893, c. 8, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1903, c. 21, § 1, p. 252;

Laws 1905, c. 30, § 1, p. 258;

Laws 1907, c. 17, § 1, p. 128;

R.S.1913, § 5118;

Laws 1917, c. 103, § 1, p. 273;

Laws 1919, c. 48, § 1, p. 139;

Laws 1919, c. 52, § 1, p. 152;

Laws 1919, c. 46, § 2, p. 133;

C.S.1922, § 4292;

Laws 1925, c. 41, § 1, p. 159;

C.S.1929, § 17-441;

Laws 1935, c. 34, § 1, p. 143;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-441;

R.S.1943, § 17-538.

The power to fix rates for furnishing water to city and inhabitants is vested in the municipality and such rates are presumed lawful and reasonable unless clearly shown to be confiscatory. McCook Waterworks Co. v. City of McCook, 85 Neb. 677, 124 N.W. 100 (1909).

Where title of ordinance did not refer to contract for "rental for hydrant" used in body of ordinance, though the ordinance authorized third party to construct and maintain water system and use the streets, such contract was void as to water rentals. Lincoln Land Co. v. Village of Grant, 57 Neb. 70, 77 N.W. 349 (1898).